Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 14 Long-Term Care Community Choices Act of 2008
71-5-1414. Self-directed health care.

The commissioner shall, upon approval of a waiver amendment granting authority from the federal government, develop and make available consumer-directed options for persons receiving home and community-based long-term care services under the long-term care program, which may include, but are not limited to, the ability to select, direct or employ persons delivering unskilled hands-on or support services, such as personal care services, personal care assistants/attendants, homemaker services, in-home respite, the ability to direct and supervise a paid personal aide in the performance of a health care task and the ability to manage, utilizing the services of a fiscal intermediary, an individual home and community-based services budget allowance based on functional assessment performed by a qualified entity and the availability of family and other caregivers who can help provide needed support.

Members eligible to receive home and community-based long-term care pursuant to this part may, subject to regulations promulgated by the commissioner, be permitted to use the budget allowance to direct payment, utilizing the services of a fiscal intermediary, for those home and community-based services that are necessary to meet the member's long-term care needs and to prevent or delay institutionalization and that are a cost-effective use of long-term care funds. Such services shall include only those services that are permitted under the medicaid state plan or any federal waivers or amendments thereto.

Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, a competent adult with a functional disability living in the adult's own home or a caregiver acting on behalf of a minor child or incompetent adult living in the minor child’s or the incompetent adult’s own home may choose to direct and supervise a paid personal aide in the performance of a health care task.

For purposes of this section:

A competent adult is a person eighteen (18) years of age or older who has the capability and capacity to evaluate knowledgeably the options available and the risks attendant upon each and to make an informed decision, acting in accordance with the person's own preferences and values. A person is presumed competent unless a determination to the contrary is made;

A caregiver is a person who is:

Directly and personally involved in providing care for a minor child or incompetent adult; and

The parent, foster parent, family member, friend or legal guardian of such minor child or incompetent adult;

A person's home is the dwelling in which the person resides, whether the person owns, leases or rents such residence or whether the person resides in a dwelling owned, leased or rented by someone else. A person's home may include specified community-based residential alternatives to nursing facility care as promulgated in rules and regulations by the commissioner, but shall not include a nursing facility or assisted-care living facility setting;

A paid personal aide is any person providing paid home care services, such as personal care or homemaker services, that enable the person receiving care to remain at home whether the paid personal aide is employed by the person receiving care, a caregiver or by a contracted provider agency that has been authorized to provide home care services to that person; and

Health care tasks are those medical, nursing or home health services, beyond activities of daily living, that:

A person without a functional disability or a caregiver would customarily and personally perform without the assistance of a licensed health care provider;

The person is unable to perform for the person's own self due to a functional or cognitive limitation;

The treating physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or registered nurse determines can be safely performed in the home and community by a paid personal aide acting under the direction of a competent adult or caregiver; and

Enable the person to maintain independence, personal hygiene, and safety in the person's own home.

The individual or caregiver who chooses to self-direct a health care task is responsible for initiating self-direction by informing the health care professional who has ordered the treatment that involves the health care task of the individual or caregiver's intent to perform that task through self-direction.

When a licensed health care provider orders treatment involving a health care task to be performed through self-directed care, the responsibility to ascertain that the patient or caregiver understands the treatment and will be able to follow through on the self-directed care task is the same as it would be for a patient or caregiver who performs the health care task for the patient's or caregiver’s own self, and the licensed health care provider incurs no additional liability when ordering a health care task that is to be performed through self-directed care.

The role of the personal aide in self-directed care is limited to performing the physical aspect of health care tasks under the direction of the person for whom the tasks are being done or that person's caregiver. This shall not affect the ability of a personal aide to provide other home care services, such as personal care or homemaker services, that enable the person to remain at home.

The responsibility to initiate self-directed health care tasks, to possess the necessary knowledge and training for those tasks and to exercise judgment regarding the manner of their performance rests and remains with the person or caregiver who has chosen to self-direct those tasks, including the decision to employ and dismiss a personal aide or to decide that a personal aide will no longer perform a health care task.

A description of health care tasks to be performed through self-directed care will be included in the person's care plan.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules that define the qualifications, training and oversight requirements for self-direction of health care tasks. The commissioner shall develop the rules with input from licensed health care professionals, including, but not limited to, representatives of the nursing and medical professions, as well as persons with functional limitations, caregivers and home and community-based services providers.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 15; 2016, ch. 980, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1415. Quality assurance and quality improvement strategies.

The commissioner shall develop and implement quality assurance and quality improvement strategies to ensure the quality of long-term care services provided pursuant to this part and shall specify in contractor risk agreements with contractors responsible for coordination of medicaid primary, acute and long-term care services requirements related to the quality of long-term care services provided. The strategies may include the use of electronic visit verification for data collection and reporting, HEDIS measures pertaining to long-term care services, and shall include mechanisms to ensure direct feedback from members and family or other caregivers regarding the quality of services received. The commissioner shall ensure that recipients of long-term care services are notified how to contact the bureau of TennCare if they have concerns about the long-term care services they are or are not receiving and the process for resolving such issues.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1416. Funding to increase access to home and community-based services in the state-funded options program.

Subject to the availability of funding, the commissioner shall designate in each year's appropriations bill an amount of money that can be used to increase access to home and community-based services in the state-funded options program for persons who do not qualify for medicaid long-term care services. This funding may be used to provide services such as home-delivered meals, homemaker services and personal care, and to reduce the waiting list for these services under the options program, or to offer transportation services or assistance to non-medicaid-eligible individuals.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1417. Funding for medicaid long-term care services.

The commissioner shall provide medicaid long-term care services subject to the availability of funding in each year's appropriations bill.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1418. Long-term care client information, referral and assistance agency.

To address the need of this state to develop for the future the framework and infrastructure for a comprehensive long-term care system that makes an appropriate place for both institutional care and a broad array of home-based and community-based services (HBCS), this section establishes a program that is intended to provide information, referral and assistance on a wide variety of quality, cost-effective and affordable long-term care choices and that should be designed to provide data collection and individual assessment and referral to community-based services and appropriate placement in long-term care facilities.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Area agency on aging” means the agency defined in § 71-2-103;

“Assessment services” means prescreening and evaluation of an individual's health and functional status to estimate the need for long-term care services and to identify appropriate service options that meet these needs;

“Director” means the executive director of the commission on aging and disability;

“Hospital” has the meaning ascribed to such term under § 68-11-201; and

“Nursing home” has the meaning ascribed to such term under § 68-11-201.

There is established a long-term care client information, referral and assistance program, which shall be administered by the director and shall be implemented by area agencies on aging in accordance with this section.

Individuals in the community seeking long-term care services for the elderly and disabled may obtain information about the available services and receive assistance in accessing needed services from the appropriate area agency on aging. Individuals who are initially prescreened by the area agency on aging will be referred to the local health department if determination of eligibility for medicaid-funded programs is needed. Area agency on aging staff may assist the individual to ensure that appropriate documentation is collected and available when the individual is referred to the local health or human services department for medical and financial eligibility determination.

[See the Compiler's Notes.]

With the consent of the consumer or the consumer's representative, a copy of the data gathered by the information, referral and assistance provider during the screening process will be provided to the health department to facilitate the preadmission evaluation assessment process and to the department of human services for use in beginning the financial eligibility determination process. Staff from the health department and the department of human services will contact the applicant to collect information for assessment.

For those individuals already residing in nursing facilities or awaiting nursing facility placement following hospital discharge or directly seeking nursing home services, the preadmission evaluation (PAE) application will continue to be completed by the nursing facility, hospital staff or the individual's physician and submitted to the division of long-term care of the bureau of TennCare for medical criteria determination.

[See the Compiler's Notes.]

For those determined to be medically or financially ineligible for medicaid/TennCare funded services, the area agency on aging information, referral and assistance agency will:

Conduct a more in-depth assessment of the person's needs;

Identify appropriate community services to meet those needs, including eligibility requirements;

Identify providers, including government agencies, private non-profit agencies, and for-profit agencies based upon rules and regulations adopted by the commission on aging and disability;

Provide information on “How to Select a Provider”; and

Offer tracking and follow-up to assure the client has received services.

Any entity that provides client screening and assessment services pursuant to this section shall not also directly provide long-term care services.

[See the Compiler's Notes.]

Prior to January 1, 2000, the commissioner of health in consultation with the director and the commissioner of human services, shall adopt by rule, promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, a long-term care client assessment and referral data entry form. The purpose of this form is for data collection and referral services only, not to determine eligibility for services. Such form shall be concise and questions shall be limited to those necessary to carry out the stated purposes. The long-term care client assessment and referral data entry form shall be used by all information, referral and assistance providers.

[See the Compiler's Notes.]

The director and the area agencies on aging shall cooperate in compiling results of all assessment services conducted under this section. Area agencies on aging may provide assessment services under this section to assist persons seeking or needing long-term care. In providing such services, the staff of the area agencies on aging shall provide assessment and referral services.

The director, after consultation with the commissioner of health, shall assure that each area agency on aging shall compile comprehensive resource information for use by individuals and agencies related to long-term care resources, including offices of the department of health, the department of human services and county health departments. This information shall include, but not be limited to, resources available to assist persons in selecting among all available long-term care options, including both institutional and non-institutional care, and such information shall be accurate and balanced.

[See the Compiler's Notes.]

Area agencies on aging shall provide to all individuals, or caregivers of individuals in need of long-term care services, comprehensive information on the range of long-term care services that are appropriate for that individual and that are available in that individual's community.

On and after July 1, 2000, the area agencies on aging will operate or contract for a home care ombudsman program supervised by the commission on aging and disability, office of the state long-term care ombudsman. The home care ombudsman will investigate consumer/family member complaints regarding the quality of care, and assist in the resolution of problems between the consumer/family and a case manager or service provider.

The director shall adopt rules to govern such matters, as the director deems necessary for the administration of this program. Such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

Acts 1999, ch. 477, § 2; T.C.A. §71-5-1407; Acts 2008, ch. 1190, §§ 1, 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 477, § 7, provided that nothing in this section shall prohibit the commission on aging and disability or any area agency on aging from continuing to conduct information referral and assistance activities that are otherwise authorized by law. Section 8 of the act provided, however, that (c)(3), (c)(5), (d), (e) and (g) shall take effect on July 1 of any fiscal year in which funding is provided for implementation.

Former §71-4-1407 was transferred to this section by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1, without amendment, effective July 1, 2008.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

The term “commission on aging and disability” was substituted for “commission on aging” pursuant to Acts 2001, ch. 397.

71-5-1419. Operational plan and budget for home-based and community-based services to elderly and disabled individuals.

By January 1, 2000, the long-term care services planning council, in consultation with the long-term care advisory council, shall develop an operational plan and budget projections for a program for home-based and community-based services (HBCS) to elderly and disabled individuals in need of assistance. The program should provide services to elderly and disabled individuals in need of assistance who do not qualify for long-term care services under medical assistance pursuant to part 1 of this chapter. The council shall report on the program to the general assembly.

Nothing in the plan developed pursuant to this section shall be construed to create an entitlement for individuals.

The plan should identify eligible services, the extent and manner in which such services are allocated and made available to elderly and disabled individuals in need of assistance who do not qualify for long-term care services under medical assistance pursuant to part 1 of this chapter, and the manner in which such services are coordinated with each other and long-term care services available outside the program, including, but not limited to, medical assistance and medicare.

The plan shall develop and include mechanisms to include the choice of an individual and the individual's representative regarding which covered services to receive, how services are provided and who provides services.

The plan should propose a mechanism to impose cost-sharing to be set by rule with respect to covered services.

The plan shall provide for quality assurance and safeguards for the eligible individuals.

The plan shall designate a state agency to administer the program or to supervise administration of the program.

HBCS, as defined in § 71-5-103, shall be available to eligible elderly and disabled individuals in need of assistance under the program established by this section. The program shall set limits to services based on available fiscal resources. The services shall be specified in a manner that permits flexibility for providers to meet the needs of eligible individuals in a cost-effective manner with services to be delivered in an individual's home, a range of community residential arrangements, or outside the home.

HBCS would be provided under the plan required in this section to program participants if an:

Assessment pursuant to § 71-5-1407 has been made; and

Individualized plan of care is developed with involvement from the individual or the individual's representative.

The state shall make reasonable efforts to identify and arrange services described in the plan, but nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the state to provide all the services such plan may specify.

The commissioner of health is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The commission on aging and disability shall equitably allocate funding resources between urban and rural areas to program components that provide services to elderly and disabled individuals in need of assistance who do not qualify for long-term care services under medical assistance pursuant to part 1 of this chapter.

By August 1, 2001, the commission on aging and disability shall establish an average maximum statewide unit cost for service provided to elderly and disabled individuals in need of assistance who do not qualify for long-term care services pursuant to part 1 of this chapter. In developing the rate, the commission shall take into account the unit of service rate permitted for such service under any federal waiver for providing assistance under this chapter if such service is also provided under the federal waiver and in no case can it be more than twenty percent (20%) above the average statewide unit cost for that specific service.

Acts 1999, ch. 477, § 3; 2001, ch. 461, § 1; T.C.A. §71-5-1408; Acts 2008, ch. 1190, §§ 1, 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-4-1408 was transferred to this section by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1, without amendment, effective July 1, 2008.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

Acts 2001, ch. 461, § 2 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Cross-References. Commission on aging and disability, title 71, ch. 2, part 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Determining the unit costs for services provided to the aging and disabled under T.C.A. §71-5-1408 (now §71-5-1419), OAG 04-078, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 78 (4/27/04).

71-5-1420. Veterans education benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, to the extent permitted by federal law, the value of federal veterans education benefits received by an applicant shall not be included as any form of income when making eligibility determinations for assistance under this part.

Acts 2003, ch. 239, § 10; T.C.A. §71-5-1410; Acts 2008, ch. 1190, §§ 1, 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-4-1410 was transferred to this section by Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 1, without amendment, effective July 1, 2008. Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

Provisions concerning federal veteran's educational benefits are codified in 38 U.S.C. § 3101.

71-5-1421. Prompt payment of claims and liability for bad faith failure to pay claims promptly.

Any managed care organization shall comply with §56-32-126 and any prompt pay provisions within the MCO contractor risk agreements with TennCare. In addition, the MCO shall ensure that ninety percent (90%) of clean claims for nursing facility services shall be processed and paid within fourteen (14) calendar days and ninety-nine and one half percent (99.5%) paid within twenty-one (21) days.

Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 25; 2012, ch. 971, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1190, § 20 provided that, except as otherwise specified, the commissioner is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

For the Preamble to the act regarding long-term care, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1190.

71-5-1422. Pilot project for disabled individuals and family members to self-direct supports and services.

The commission on aging and disability shall develop a pilot project proposal in accordance with this section. The long-term care services planning council shall be responsible for evaluating the implementation of the project. If funded in the general appropriations act, the pilot project shall be implemented and shall continue for three (3) years. The commission shall annually report on the pilot project to the council, the health and welfare committee of the senate and the health committee of the house of representatives. At the end of the project the commission shall report on the project to the council and to the standing committees of the senate and the house of representatives. The council shall also make reports of any evaluations that it might undertake of the project to the standing committees of the senate and the house of representatives.

The commission on aging and disability shall develop a pilot project in a county or counties of one (1) of the area agencies on aging and disability (AAAD) and shall enter into a contract with the selected AAAD in order to implement the project. The project shall utilize the services of an aging and disability resource center located in the AAAD. Subject to any approvals required from the commission by the contract, a working group from the selected AAAD shall design the project and determine whether to use a program manager in the project. In selecting the AAAD, the commission shall consider any administrative and oversight efficiencies that locating the project in any particular AAAD might afford the project.

The project shall offer families with a member with a disability who requires long-term supports and services and individuals with a disability who require long-term supports and services opportunities to direct their own services. The families and individuals shall exercise choice, control and responsibility for their services within a cost neutral framework.

The project may involve the following:

Personal control and choice;

Encouragement of cost-effective decision-making in the purchase of supports and services;

Allowing eligible families and individuals to receive a cash allowance or an individual budget to obtain personal assistant services and related supports; and

Providing fiscal agent and supportive broker services to sustain individuals and families in directing their own services.

Acts 2008, ch. 1168, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 50.

71-5-1423. Hearing on resident’s appeal of involuntary discharge from facility — Timeframe for hearing and final order.

If a resident appeals the facility's notice of involuntary discharge to that resident and a hearing is requested pursuant to 42 C.F.R. § 431.220(a)(3) before the bureau of TennCare:

The hearing shall be conducted and a final order rendered within ninety (90) days from the date of the resident's appeal of the facility's involuntary discharge notice;

The timeframe specified in subdivision (1) may be extended or continued with the consent of both the facility and the resident; and

The timeframe specified in subdivision (1) may be extended by the presiding administrative law judge without the consent of the facility, but only after a showing by the resident, or the resident's representative, that the resident faces a substantial threat of irreparable damage or injury if a continuance is not granted.

Acts 2014, ch. 911, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 911, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to any appeals of discharges filed on or after May 13, 2014.

71-5-1424. Hearing on appeal of TennCare’s initial determination of ineligibility for nursing facility services — Motion to intervene by facility.

If an individual appeals TennCare's initial determination that they are not eligible for TennCare nursing facility services:

The hearing on any appeal of an initial determination that the individual is not financially eligible shall be conducted and a final order rendered within ninety (90) days from the date of the individual's appeal; provided, however, that if the individual files a petition for reconsideration of an initial order or appeals an order, other than a final order, pertaining to an initial determination made by TennCare under this section prior to the expiration of the ninety-day period, the running of the ninety-day period shall be tolled pending the outcome of such petition for reconsideration or appeal; and

The facility may be entitled to participate in any proceeding and hearing that appeals an initial determination that the individual is not financially or medically eligible through the filing of a motion to intervene in that proceeding under § 4-5-310. The administrative judge or hearing officer shall grant a facility's motion to intervene in the appeal of a resident or former resident's eligibility, absent a showing by one (1) or more parties to the appeal that the facility's participation would cause that party to incur an undue burden or unnecessary expense.

Acts 2014, ch. 911, § 1; 2020, ch. 750, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 911, § 2 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to any appeals of discharges filed on or after May 13, 2014.

Acts 2020, ch. 750, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to appeals initiated on or after June 22, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added the second sentence in (2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 750, § 2. June 22, 2020.

71-5-1425. Guidance regarding whether temporary family healthcare structures are covered — Federal approval of waiver amendment to offer benefit — Applicability of waiver.

As part of the plan to expand cost-effective community-based residential alternatives to institutional care as required pursuant to § 71-5-1411(a), the bureau of TennCare shall seek written guidance from the centers for medicare and medicaid services regarding whether a temporary family healthcare structure, as defined in § 13-7-501, may be covered in whole or in part under the program established pursuant to this part, and, if so, shall, upon appropriation by the general assembly specifically to cover temporary family healthcare structures, seek federal approval of a waiver amendment to offer such benefit to eligible older adults and persons with disabilities who choose temporary family healthcare structures in lieu of care in other settings.

Any waiver approved pursuant to subsection (a) shall apply only to a person who:

Meets the CHOICES 2 activities of daily living criteria;

Meets financial eligibility requirements for medical assistance under this chapter; and

Is either:

A person with a developmental or intellectual disability, as defined in § 33-1-101, who is related to the owner or occupier of the property; or

An older adult who is related to the owner or occupier of the property.

Acts 2016, ch. 992, § 2.